Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 9
REVIEW AND TERMINATION PROVISIONS

44-32-901. Repeal of article - review of functions.

This article 32 is repealed, effective September 1, 2023. Before its repeal, the division and its functions are scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 320, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-901 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

Pursuant to § 44-32-103, the division and the commission are subject to the termination schedule in § 24-34-104.